Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 23.3
The Ocean State Climate Adaptation and Resilience Fund

46-23.3-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Ocean State Climate Adaptation and Resilience Fund.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 377, § 2, effective July 13, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 378, § 2, effective July 13, 2021.

46-23.3-2.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:

“Adaptation and resilience projects” means those projects on public land that protect or enhance coastal or riverine habitats to address climate change impacts. Adaptation and resilience projects include, but are not limited to: those projects that reduce the vulnerability of low-lying infrastructure on public land through measures that include removal and relocation of infrastructure; restoration of river and stream floodplains, including regrading of banks; revegetation; acquisition of that area of land necessary to maintain and preserve public access; and redesigning, resizing, and replacing culverts and bridge spans at existing wetland crossings.

“Bank” means the Rhode Island infrastructure bank.

“Climate change impacts” means and includes, but is not limited to: flooding, erosion, sea level rise, and storm surge.

“Council” means the coastal resources management council.

“Department” means the department of environmental management.

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental management.

“Infrastructure” means and includes, but is not limited to: roads, parking lots, and other paved surfaces; shoreline protection structures; buildings; water control structures; culverts; other structures; and remnants of development.

“Public land(s)” means property owned by state or municipal governments, including any quasi-public agencies thereof, public and private lands dedicated to public use, including lands that provide access to shorelines and riverbanks. Public lands include properties where the state or municipality holds an easement for public purposes.

“Shoreline protection structures” means and includes, but is not limited to: revetments, bulkheads, seawalls and floodwalls, breakwaters, jetties, and other structures, the purpose or effect of which is to control the erosion of coastal or river features, and includes, but is not limited to, any sheet pile walls, concrete or stone walls.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 377, § 2, effective July 13, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 378, § 2, effective July 13, 2021.

46-23.3-3.
Technical advisory committee.

There is hereby established a technical advisory committee consisting of four (4) members as follows: one member shall be the director of the department of environmental management, or designee; one member shall be the director of the coastal resources management council, or designee; one member shall be the director of the state planning council within the department of administration, or designee; and one member shall be the director of the Rhode Island emergency management authority, or designee. The technical advisory committee shall serve as an advisory board to the department, council, and the program staff.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 377, § 2, effective July 13, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 378, § 2, effective July 13, 2021.

46-23.3-4.
Establishment — The Ocean State Climate Adaptation and Resilience fund.

Establishment. There is established within the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, the Ocean State Climate Adaptation and Resilience fund (the “OSCAR fund”).

Financing. The fund shall consist of the following sources:

Sums the general assembly may appropriate;

Monies received from federal, state, or other sources, including bond funds, for the purposes of the OSCAR fund;

Monies received from any private donor for the OSCAR fund; and

Any interest earned on the monies in the fund.

Allocation of OSCAR funds. OSCAR funds shall be used to carry out the purposes of this chapter as follows:

The administrative expenses required to carry out the activities of the program as described in this chapter shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) each for the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, coastal resources management council, and the department of environmental management annually, which sum shall not include the cost of issuing bonds or notes, if any. The department and the council shall be responsible for submitting annual budget requests for its administrative and implementation costs of the program to the bank;

The planning, design, engineering, construction, and monitoring of adaptation and resilience projects as defined in this chapter; and

The OSCAR projects approved by the department and the council upon recommendation of the technical advisory committee. Only grants approved through the process established by the department and council shall be eligible for funding under this program. Subject to the availability of funds in the OSCAR fund, the bank shall award funding upon receipt of written approval of the department and council.

OSCAR fund grants. Factors to be taken into consideration by the technical advisory committee for the purposes of granting monies to municipalities and the state for OSCAR grants, for determining the eligibility of projects for financial assistance, and in prioritizing the selection of projects by the technical committee shall include, but need not be limited to:

Consistency with the following where applicable: the council’s most recent projections for sea level rise, the coastal habitat restoration strategy, the state nonpoint source pollution control plan; and other applicable state and federal laws;

The ability and authority of the applicant to carry out and properly maintain the adaptation and resilience project;

Whether the project will enhance public access to public land;

The severity to, or the risk and/or extent of, infrastructure degradation on public land;

The extent of the use by the public of the public land;

The proposed milestones to ensure that the project is completed as designed and approved;

Whether the adaptation and resilience project can also be shown to create or replace habitat losses that benefit fish and wildlife resources;

Potential water quality improvements;

Potential improvements to fish and wildlife habitats for species that are identified as rare or endangered by the Rhode Island natural history survey or the Federal Endangered Species Act, 16 U.S.C. § 1531 et seq.;

The level and extent of collaboration by partners (e.g., municipality, nongovernment organization, watershed council, federal agency, etc.); and

Overall potential benefits to the public and estimated length of time frame of benefit.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 377, § 2, effective July 13, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 378, § 2, effective July 13, 2021.

46-23.3-5.
Eligible and ineligible projects.

Funds in the Ocean State Climate Adaptation and Resilience (OSCAR) fund shall be used solely for adaptation and resilience projects as defined in §

46-23.3-2

.

The OSCAR fund shall not be used for:

Mitigating any current, planned, or future projects that degrade, fill, or otherwise destroy coastal, estuarine, or riverine habitats;

Fulfilling any liability for restoration required by any local, state, or federal agency pursuant to an environmental or public health enforcement action;

With the exception of culverts as specifically described in §

46-23.3-2(1)

, elevating, repairing, or replacing infrastructure, or constructing new infrastructure, in its existing location that is experiencing climate change impacts as defined in §

46-23.3-2(3)

;

Constructing new, or repairing existing shoreline protection structures; provided, however, that existing shoreline protection structures on public parks may be repaired; and/or

Constructing roads or bridges.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 377, § 2, effective July 13, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 378, § 2, effective July 13, 2021.

46-23.3-6.
Disbursement process and reporting.

The department and the council shall establish and execute a process, at least annually, for the solicitation, evaluation, and award of grants for projects that meet the requirements set forth in this chapter. The department and council shall forward their respective written notification of approval of a project application to the bank.

The department, the council, and the bank shall jointly submit a report to the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate not later than the tenth day following the convening of each regular session of the general assembly. The report shall include the following:

The amount of money awarded from the OSCAR fund during the preceding fiscal year;

A brief summary of the projects that received funding and a timeline of implementation; and

Any other information requested by the general assembly.

Nothing contained in this chapter is intended to abrogate or affect the existing powers of the department of environmental management, the coastal resources management council, or the bank.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 377, § 2, effective July 13, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 378, § 2, effective July 13, 2021.

46-23.3-7.
Regulations.

The council, the department, and the bank shall adopt all rules and regulations necessary for the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 377, § 2, effective July 13, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 378, § 2, effective July 13, 2021.